Hawaii statutes.
§712-1203 Promoting prostitution. (1)
A person commits the offense of promoting prostitution if the person knowingly
advances or profits from prostitution.

(2) Promoting prostitution is a class B
felony. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 130, §3; am L 2008, c 147, §9; am
L 2011, c 145, §4; am L 2016, c 206, §15]

Case Notes

Statements made by women constituted verbal acts and were
admissible against defendant charged under subsection (1)(a). 59 H. 401, 581
P.2d 1171 (1978).

Section 701-109(1)(d) prohibits conviction under both this
section and §842-2(2), as both this section and §842-2(2) seek to redress the
same conduct--the control of an enterprise involved in criminal activity. In
such case, this section, the specific statute, governs over the general
statute, §842-2(2). 88 H. 19, 960 P.2d 1227 (1998).

Cited: 58 H. 299, 568 P.2d 504 (1977).

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §§712-1201 TO 712-1204

Act 206, Session Laws 2016, amended §712-1201 by amending the
section heading to conform to amendments made to other sections in the Hawaii
Revised Statutes by Act 206.

Act 206, Session Laws 2016, amended §712-1202, among others,
to establish a victim and survivor-centered approach to comprehensive anti-sex
trafficking laws. Specifically, Act 206 amended §712-1202 by: (1) replacing
the offense of promoting prostitution in the first degree with sex trafficking,
a class A felony and violent crime; and (2) specifying that the offense of sex
trafficking requires proof of negligence with respect to the victim's age when
the victim of sex trafficking is under eighteen years of age. The legislature
found that the existing laws relating to prostitution and promoting
prostitution may not have been suitable to address certain circumstances in
which coercion or other inability to consent is present. Act 206 allowed
Hawaii to join other states that had adopted comprehensive anti-sex trafficking
legislation. Conference Committee Report No. 147-16, Senate Standing Committee
Report No. 3450.

Act 206, Session Laws 2016, amended §712-1203 to change the
offense of promoting prostitution in the second degree to the offense of
promoting prostitution. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3450.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next